Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB208.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 913(b.1)6 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 913. Place and Time of Filing Nomination Petitions; Filing Fees.--* * *(b.1) Each person filing any nomination petition shall pay for each petition, at the time of filing, a filing fee to be determined as follows, and no nomination petition shall be 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 accepted or filed, unless and until such filing fee is paid by a certified check or money order or also by cash when filed with the county board. All moneys paid on account of filing fees shall be transmitted by the county board to the county treasurer and shall become part of the General Fund. Certified checks or money orders in payment of filing fees shall be made payable to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or to the county, as the case may be, and shall be transmitted to the State Treasurer or to the county treasurer and shall become part of the General Fund.* * *6. If for the office of [delegate or alternate delegate to National party convention, or] member of National committee or member of State committee, the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0208PN0156 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516